Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2892.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; Apache county; rural school bus route enhancement and soil stabilization project The sum of $665,500 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to distribute to Apache county for the rural school bus route enhancement and soil stabilization project.